New York, session 2025-2026, A1477.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 695-e of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 593 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 5. a. An account owner may withdraw all or part of the balance from an 5 account on sixty days notice or such shorter period as may be authorized 6 under rules governing the program. Such rules shall include provisions 7 that will generally enable the determination as to whether a withdrawal 8 is a nonqualified withdrawal or a qualified withdrawal. 9 b. For purposes of this subdivision, a qualified withdrawal shall 10 include a withdrawal in which the account owner withdraws all or part of 11 a balance from an account to fund treatment of substance use disorder, 12 including detoxification and rehabilitation, for the designated benefi- 13 ciary. Such treatment shall consist of at least fifteen hours and 14 include, but need not be limited to, classroom instruction in areas 15 deemed suitable by the commissioner. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01582-01-5